Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.660

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Rules.

The director shall adopt such rules under RCW 41.50.050 as the director may find necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650 and to avoid conflicts with any applicable federal or state laws.

[ 1987 c 326 s 27.]